Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1162.
do enact as follows:AB1162,11Section 1. 196.03 (7) of the statutes is created to read:AB1162,2,22196.03 (7) (a) In this subsection:AB1162,2,331. “Electric utility” has the meaning given in s. 196.378 (1) (d).AB1162,2,542. “Very large customer” has the meaning assigned by the commission to a 5class or subclass of an electric utility’s customers by order under par. (b).AB1162,2,96(b) By December 15, 2027, the commission shall establish by order the 7definition and appropriate characteristics of a very large customer class or subclass 8for each electric utility. The commission may satisfy the requirement under this 9paragraph in a rate case for the electric utility or in another proceeding.AB1162,2,1410(c) Any electric utility that offers a tariff or contract rate to a very large 11customer shall file a rate case application with the commission by April 1 of every 12other year. The chair of the commission may issue a waiver of the rate case 13application filing deadline if the electric utility demonstrates exceptional 14circumstances that necessitate such a waiver. AB1162,3,515(d) In a rate case under par. (c), the electric utility shall provide information 16necessary for the commission to determine the total costs the electric utility incurs, 17and is forecasted to incur, in providing service to the very large customer under the 18tariff or contract rate. The commission shall promulgate rules to establish the 19specific requirements electric utilities shall follow to justify how the current or 20proposed rates in a rate case under this subsection pay for the costs of providing 21service to a very large customer. Considering the information provided by the 22electric utility, the commission shall determine whether the rates charged to the 1very large customer are just and reasonable under sub. (1) and whether they are 2unreasonable, preferential, or unjustly discriminatory under s. 196.37. If deemed 3unreasonable, preferential, or unjustly discriminatory, the commission shall adjust 4rates or modify the terms of service for the very large customer in a manner 5appropriate to bring the rates into compliance with sub. (1) and s. 196.37.AB1162,26Section 2. Initial applicability.AB1162,3,97(1) Electric service to very large customers. The treatment of s. 196.03 8(7) first applies to a tariff or agreement submitted to the commission for its review 9on the effective date of this subsection.AB1162,3,1010